Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.1315

Charitable assets.

Property held for a charitable purpose under the law of this state by a domestic or foreign cooperative association immediately before a conversion or merger under this subchapter becomes effective may not, as a result of the conversion or merger, be diverted from the objects for which it was donated, granted, devised, or otherwise transferred unless, to the extent required by or pursuant to the law of this state concerning cy pres or other law dealing with nondiversion of charitable assets, the entity obtains an appropriate order of the attorney general specifying the disposition of the property.

[ 2019 c 37 s 1315.]